Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,142
Dissolved corporation; trustees; corporate claims and property; duty to sue; liability.

They shall sue for and recover the debts and property of the corporation, and shall be responsible to the creditors and stockholders, respectively, to the extent of the effects which come to their hands, in the same manner as though they were the executors of a deceased person.

R.S.1867, Code § 725, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8349;

C.S.1922, § 9301;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,133;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,142.